Maryland, session 2025, HB1471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
7–102.
(b) This title does not apply to:
(1) a bank;
(2) a federal or State credit union;
(3) a mortgage lender;
(4) a person acting under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
(5) a licensed real estate broker, or an individual acting on behalf of the
real estate broker, in the collection of rent or allied charges for property;
(6) a savings and loan association;
(7) a title company as to its escrow business;
(8) a trust company;
(9) a lawyer who is collecting a debt for a client, unless the lawyer has an
employee who:
(i) is not a lawyer; and
(ii) is engaged primarily to solicit debts for collection or primarily
makes contact with a debtor to collect or adjust a debt through a procedure identified with
the operation of a collection agency; [or]
(10) a person who is collecting a debt for another person if:
(i) both persons are related by common ownership;
(ii) the person who is collecting a debt does so only for those persons
to whom it is related by common ownership;
(iii) the principal business of the person who is collecting a debt is not
the collection of debts; and

HOUSE BILL 1471 3
(iv) before collecting a debt, the person files with the Board:
1. the correct name of the person;
2. an address and telephone number of a contact person; and
3. the name of the person’s resident agent; OR
(11) A PERSON WHO HOLDS A CERTIFICATION UNDER THE INNOVATIVE
FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE.
Article – Commercial Law
12–101.2.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO HOLDS A CERTIFICATION
UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE OR ANY LOAN PROVIDED BY OR THROUGH A PRODUCT OR
SERVICE PROVIDED BY A PERSON CERTIFIED UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL
PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.
12–301.1.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO HOLDS A CERTIFICATION
UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE OR ANY LOAN PROVIDED BY OR THROUGH A PRODUCT OR
SERVICE PROVIDED BY A PERSON CERTIFIED UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL
PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.
12–901.1.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO HOLDS A CERTIFICATION
UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE OR ANY LOAN PROVIDED BY OR THROUGH A PRODUCT OR
SERVICE PROVIDED BY A PERSON CERTIFIED UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL
PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.
12–1001.1.

HOUSE BILL 1471
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO HOLDS A CERTIFICATION
UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE OR ANY LOAN PROVIDED BY OR THROUGH A PRODUCT OR
SERVICE PROVIDED BY A PERSON CERTIFIED UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL
PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.
Article – Financial Institutions
11–202.
(a) The Maryland Consumer Loan Law does not change any powers conferred by
law on any person who is not required or permitted to be licensed under this subtitle.
(b) The Commissioner may not license any bank, trust company, savings bank,
credit union, or savings and loan association.
(C) THE MARYLAND CONSUMER LOAN LAW DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON
WHO HOLDS A CERTIFICATION UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR
SERVICE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12
OF THIS ARTICLE OR ANY LOAN PROVIDED BY OR THROUGH A PRODUCT OR SERVICE
PROVIDED BY A PERSON CERTIFIED UNDER THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT
OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.
SUBTITLE 12. INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR SERVICE CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM.
12–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “APPRECIATION TIP” MEANS AN AMOUNT PAID BY A BORROWER TO A
LENDER ON CONSUMMATION OF A LOAN ARRANGED THROUGH A PEER–TO–PEER
LENDING SERVICE THAT:
(1) IS PAID AT THE OPTION OF THE BORROWER; AND
(2) IS NOT REQUIRED TO SUBMIT A LOAN REQUEST OR RECEIVE A
LOAN THROUGH THE PEER–TO–PEER LENDING SERVICE.
(C) “INNOVATION” MEANS THE USE OR INCORPORATION OF NEW OR
EMERGING TECHNOLOGY OR THE REIMAGINATION OF USES FOR EXISTING

HOUSE BILL 1471 5
TECHNOLOGY TO ENHANCE LENDING AND ACCESS TO CREDIT FOR CONSUMERS IN
THE STATE.
(D) “INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR SERVICE” MEANS A FINANCIAL
PRODUCT OR SERVICE THAT INCLUDES AN INNOVATION.
(E) “PEER–TO–PEER LENDING SERVICE” MEANS A LENDING PLATFORM
THAT:
(1) ASSISTS CONSUMERS IN RECEIVING SMALL LOANS FOR
PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD USE FROM INDIVIDUAL LENDERS, INCLUDING
LOANS RANGING FROM $50 TO $500;
(2) ASSIGNS SCORES TO BORROWERS TO ASSIST INDIVIDUAL
LENDERS IN DETERMINING THE CREDITWORTHINESS OF BORROWERS;
(3) ALLOWS BORROWERS TO SET THEIR OWN TERMS, INCLUDING THE
LOAN AMOUNT AND PAYBACK DATE, AND PROVIDE APPRECIATION TIPS TO LENDERS
WHO AGREE TO FUND A LOAN;
(4) PROVIDES FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF ACCOUNTS THAT
INDIVIDUALS MUST USE TO LEND AND BORROW THROUGH THE PLATFORM;
(5) IF THE PROPOSED TERMS OF A LOAN REQUEST ARE
SATISFACTORY TO A LENDER, FACILITATES THE EXECUTION OF A PROMISSORY
NOTE BETWEEN THE BORROWER AND LENDER; AND
(6) IF A BORROWER FAILS TO PAY BACK A LOAN WITHIN A REQUIRED
TERM, ASSISTS WITH THE COLLECTION OF LOAN PAYMENTS OWED ON AN ACCOUNT.
(F) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR
SERVICE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.
12–1202.
(A) THERE IS AN INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR SERVICE
CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FOR AND ENCOURAGE
THE INTRODUCTION AND IMPLEMENTATION OF INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL SERVICES
OR PRODUCTS IN THE STATE BY REMOVING LICENSURE AND OTHER REGULATORY

HOUSE BILL 1471
REQUIREMENTS THAT MAY IMPOSE COSTS AND LIMITATIONS IMPACTING THE
FEASIBILITY OF LENDING AND PROVIDING ACCESS TO CREDIT THROUGH THE
INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL SERVICES AND PRODUCTS.
(D) THE COMMISSIONER:
(1) SHALL ISSUE A CERTIFICATION UNDER THE PROGRAM FOR A
PROVIDER OF A QUALIFYING PEER–TO–PEER LENDING SERVICE; AND
(2) MAY ISSUE A CERTIFICATION UNDER THE PROGRAM TO
PROVIDERS OF OTHER TYPES OF INNOVATIVE PRODUCTS OR SERVICES THAT ARE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER TO ENHANCE LENDING AND ACCESS TO
CREDIT FOR CONSUMERS IN THE STATE.
(E) THE COMMISSIONER MAY SUSPEND OR REVOKE A CERTIFICATION
ISSUED UNDER THE PROGRAM IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT A
CERTIFICATE HOLDER HAS ENGAGED IN AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, DECEPTIVE, OR
FRAUDULENT PRACTICE IN PROVIDING THE INNOVATIVE FINANCIAL PRODUCT OR
SERVICE UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(F) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.